Illinois, session 104th, HB1157.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 2A-1.1a as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/2A-1.1a)  (from Ch. 46, par. 2A-1.1a)7    Sec. 2A-1.1a. Whenever the date designated in paragraph 8(b) of Section 2A-1.1 for the consolidated election conflicts 9with the celebration of Passover, that election shall be 10postponed to the first Tuesday following the last day of 11Passover. As used in this Section, "the celebration of 12Passover" includes the eight-day period beginning on the 15th 13day of the Hebrew lunisolar month of Nisan. 14(Source: P.A. 82-1014.) 15    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by changing 16Section 30-5 as follows: 17    (60 ILCS 1/30-5)18    Sec. 30-5. Annual township meeting. 19    (a) The annual township meeting in the respective 20townships for the transaction of the business of the township 21shall be held on the second Tuesday of April in each year,   HB1157- 2 -LRB104 06250 JDS 16285 b1after 6 p.m., at the place appointed for those meetings. 2Elections for township officers shall be held in accordance 3with the consolidated schedule of elections prescribed by the 4general election law.5    (b) Whenever the date designated in subsection (a) 6conflicts with the celebration of Passover or Ramadan, the 7township board may postpone the annual township meeting to the 8first Tuesday following the last day of Passover or Ramadan. 9As used in this Section, "the celebration of Passover" 10includes the eight-day period beginning on the 15th day of the 11Hebrew lunisolar month of Nisan. 12    (c) Whenever the consolidated election provided for in 13subsection (b) of Section 2A-1.1 of the Election Code is 14rescheduled to the second Tuesday in April under Section 152A-1.1a of the Election Code, the annual township meeting 16shall be held on the third Tuesday in April at the time 17designated by the electors or the township board, whichever is 18appropriate.19    (d) If the Governor declares a disaster under Section 7 of 20the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act and the disaster 21declaration is effective during the dates designated for a 22township's annual meeting under subsection (a), (b), or (c), a 23township board may postpone the annual meeting if 24circumstances related to the disaster declaration prevent a 25township from holding its annual meeting. An annual township 26meeting postponed under this subsection shall be held on the   HB1157- 3 -LRB104 06250 JDS 16285 b1third Tuesday, after 6 p.m., of the month following the 2expiration of the disaster declaration. If a subsequent 3disaster is declared under Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency 4Management Agency Act prior to or one day after the expiration 5of the disaster declaration upon which the township board 6based its decision to postpone the annual meeting and the 7township board intends to proceed with the annual meeting 8during this subsequent disaster declaration, the township 9board must consult with and receive written approval from the 10county health department in order to proceed with the annual 11meeting during the course of the subsequent disaster 12declaration. 13(Source: P.A. 101-632, eff. 6-5-20; 102-554, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    Section 15. The Revised Cities and Villages Act of 1941 is 15amended by changing Section 21-5a as follows: 16    (65 ILCS 20/21-5a)  (from Ch. 24, par. 21-5a)17    Sec. 21-5a. Whenever the date for the runoff election of 18the mayor of the city of Chicago conflicts with the 19celebration of Passover, that election shall be postponed to 20the first Tuesday following the last day of Passover. As used 21in this Section, "the celebration of Passover" includes the 22eight-day period beginning on the 15th day of the Hebrew 23lunisolar month of Nisan. 24(Source: P.A. 89-95, eff. 1-1-96.)   HB1157- 4 -LRB104 06250 JDS 16285 b1    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 233-1b as follows: 3    (105 ILCS 5/33-1b)  (from Ch. 122, par. 33-1b)4    Sec. 33-1b. Whenever the date designated in Section 33-1 5for the election of members of boards of education conflicts 6with the celebration of Passover, that election shall be 7postponed to the first Tuesday following the last day of 8Passover. As used in this Section, "the celebration of 9Passover" includes the eight-day period beginning on the 15th 10day of the Hebrew lunisolar month of Nisan. 11(Source: P.A. 82-1014.)